lexicon/verb.lexc
!!! Конструкции ал + гл. движения
LEXICON Verb_Al
! 	ал+		Verb_MOV;
	ал		Tag_V_Al;

LEXICON Verb_MOV
	кел		Tag_V;
	кир		Tag_V; ! <<<
	пар		Tag_V;
	шық		Tag_V;
	эн		Tag_V;

! Отрицательный глагол эбес — ???
LEXICON Verb_NEG
	эбес		Tag_VNEG; ! Недостаточный глагол э + -NEG[БАс] ???
	чоғул		Tag_VNEG; ! < чоқ ‘не|нет’
